Sidath/files/g1.foma
### Sinhala.foma ###

# Vowels
define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define B [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ී | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා | ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ];

define C [ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්];



read lexc g1.lexc
define Lexicon;

######### Rewrite rules

###SeraseA,HesireA,WehereA,HeppeA,DikgesseA,PelabeA
define SeraseAClass          ෙ -> 0 || .#. [ද ි ක ් | 0] A [ ැ | ෙ] A [ි | 0 | ැ | ්] A _  "^" [B | C] ;

###SeraseB,HesireB,WehereB,HeppeB,DikgesseB
define SeraseBClass          ැ -> 0 || .#. [ද ි ක ් | 0] A _ A [ි | 0 | ැ | ්] A  "^" C ;

define HesireCClass           ි -> ු || .#. A A _ A  "^" C ;
define WehereCClass          ැ -> 0 || .#. A A _ A  "^" C ;

###DeneA,YedeA,ThereA,PeedeA
define DeneAClass            ෙ -> 0 || .#. A [ ැ | ෙ | ේ | ෑ] A _  "^" [B | C] ;

define DeneBClass            ැ -> 0 || .#. A _ A  "^" C ;

###YedeB,PelabeB
define YedeBClass            ෙ -> ො || .#. A _ A [්| 0] [A | 0]  "^" C ;

define ThereBClass           ේ -> ෝ || .#. A _ A  "^" C ;
define PeedeBClass           ෑ -> ා || .#. A _ A  "^" C ;

define IpadeAClass           ෙ -> 0 || .#. ඉ A A _  "^" [B | C] ;
define IpadeBClass           ඉ -> උ || .#. _ A A  "^" C ;



# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassE1Grammar 	Lexicon               .o.
                        SeraseAClass          .o.
                        SeraseBClass          .o.
                        HesireCClass          .o.
                        WehereCClass          .o.
                        DeneAClass            .o.
                        DeneBClass            .o.
                        YedeBClass            .o.
                        ThereBClass           .o.
                        PeedeBClass           .o.
                        IpadeAClass           .o.
                        IpadeBClass           .o.
               	        Cleanup;

regex ClassE1Grammar;
